Utah statutes.
53-1-102.   Definitions.
(1)  As used in this title:
(a)  "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public safety appointed under
Section 53-1-107.
(b)  "Department" means the Department of Public Safety created in Section
53-1-103.
(c)  "Law enforcement agency" means an entity of the federal government, a
state, or a political subdivision of a state, including a state institution of
higher education, that exists primarily to prevent and detect crime and
enforce criminal laws, statutes, and ordinances.
(d)  "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as provided in Section
53-13-103.
(e)  "Motor vehicle" means every self-propelled vehicle and every vehicle
propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not
operated upon rails, except motorized wheel chairs and vehicles moved solely
by human power.
(f)  "Peace officer" means any officer certified in accordance with Title 53,
Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications.
(g)  "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as provided
in Section 53B-3-102.
(h)  "Vehicle" means every device in, upon, or by which any person or property
is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, excepting devices used
exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.
(2)  The definitions provided in Subsection (1) are to be applied throughout
this title in addition to definitions that are applicable to specific chapters
or parts.
